Maryland, session 2025, HB1280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
3–303.
(a) Notification of a change of party affiliation or a change to or from a decline
may be made:
(1) by information provided on a voter registration application by the same
methods provided for registration under Subtitle 2 of this title;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1280*

HOUSE BILL 1280
(2) by written notice, signed by the voter and sent by mail or otherwise
delivered to the local board in the county where the voter’s current voter registration
address is located or to which the voter has moved;
(3) by making application in person at the office of the local board in the
county where the voter’s current voter registration address is located or to which the voter
has moved;
(4) by information on a voter authority card or other appropriate form filled
out in a polling place; or
(5) by changing a name or address with the Motor Vehicle Administration.
(b) Party affiliation changes or changes to or from a decline:
(1) shall be processed at any time that registration is open; and
(2) except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, may not be processed
when registration is closed.
(c) (1) If a local board receives a request for a party affiliation change after the
close of registration, the local board shall make the change and it shall become effective for
the next election provided:
[(1)] (I) there is sufficient evidence, as determined by the local boards
pursuant to regulations adopted by the State Board, that the request was mailed on or
before the close of registration for that election; or
[(2)] (II) the request was submitted by the voter to the Motor Vehicle
Administration, a voter registration agency, another local board, or the State Board on or
before the close of registration for that election.
(2) DURING A PRIMARY ELECTION, A VOTER WHO HAS DECLINED TO
AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL PARTY MAY REQUEST TO AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL
PARTY AT AN EARLY VOTING CENTER.
3–305.
(a) (1) During early voting, an individual may appear in person at an early
voting center in the individual’s county of residence and apply to register to vote or change
the voter’s address on an existing voter registration.
(2) DURING EARLY VOTING BEFORE A PRIMARY ELECTION, AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS DECLINED TO AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL PARTY MAY
APPEAR IN PERSON AT AN EARLY VOTING CENTER IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S COUNTY OF

HOUSE BILL 1280 3
RESIDENCE AND APPLY TO CHANGE THE VOTER’S EXISTING VOTER REGISTRATION
TO AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL PARTY.
(E) (1) WHEN A VOTER WHO HAS DECLINED TO AFFILIATE WITH A
POLITICAL PARTY APPLIES TO CHANGE THE VOTER’S EXISTING VOTER
REGISTRATION TO AFFILIATE WITH A POLITICAL PARTY DURING EARLY VOTING
BEFORE A PRIMARY ELECTION, THE ELECTION JUDGE SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER
THE VOTER RESIDES IN THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE VOTER SEEKS TO VOTE.
(2) IF THE VOTER IS A RESIDENT OF THE COUNTY, THE ELECTION
JUDGE SHALL:
(I) ISSUE THE VOTER A VOTER AUTHORITY CARD;
(II) HAVE THE VOTER SIGN THE VOTER AUTHORITY CARD; AND
(III) ISSUE THE VOTER A BALLOT FOR THE APPROPRIATE
POLITICAL PARTY.
[(e)] (F) The State Board shall adopt regulations and procedures in accordance
with the requirements of this section for the administration of voter registration during
early voting.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.